Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 1. General Provisions.
The 2011 amendment by c. 719 added subdivision 55 and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 821 and 854 are identical, and in subdivision 42, substituted “The Center may” for “The Center shall” in the second sentence; and in subdivisions 46 and 47, deleted “of this chapter” from the end.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 140 and 159 are identical, and in subdivision 9, inserted “as well as the time required for completion of such training,” deleted “and for” following “local criminal justice agencies,” and substituted “juvenile correctional officers employed at a juvenile correctional facility as the term is defined in §

66-25.3

” for “establish the time required for completion of such training.”

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 106, effective January 1, 2013, are identical, and inserted subdivision 56, redesignated former subdivision 56 as subdivision 57 and made a related change.

The 2012 amendment by c. 827, effective April 18, 2012, inserted subdivision 11; redesignated former subdivisions 11 to 40 as subdivisions 12 to 41; deleted former subdivison 41, which had previously expired.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 7 and 158 are identical and, in the first sentence of subsection 44, substituted “Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety” for “Virginia Center for School Safety.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 265, added the second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Alcoholic Beverage Control Board” in subdivision 37 f.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 205 and 223 are identical, and added subdivision 57 and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 222 and 402 are identical, and added subdivision 57, which was subsequently renumbered as subdivision 58 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2015 amendment by c. 278 deleted former subdivision 6, which read, “Establish compulsory training courses for law-enforcement officers in laws and procedures relating to entrapment, search and seizure, evidence, and techniques of report writing, which training shall be completed by law-enforcement officers who have not completed the compulsory training standards set out in subdivision 2, prior to assignment of any such officers to undercover investigation work. Failure to complete the training shall not, for that reason, constitute grounds to exclude otherwise properly admissible testimony or other evidence from such officer resulting from any undercover investigation.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 197 and 256 are identical, effective July 1, 2017, and added subdivision 59, which was subsequently renumbered 51, and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment by c. 235 rewrote the section to consolidate provisions requiring establishment of training standards in former subdivisions 37, 38, 41, 45, 50, 52, 53, 54 and 57, and in the last sentence of former subdivision 55, as subdivisions 37 a through j and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2016 amendment by c. 481, in subdivision 37 a, inserted “subsection A of.”

The 2016 amendment by c. 560 added subdivision 59, which was subsequently renumbered 52, and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 311, in subdivision 42, inserted “(VCSCS)” in the first sentence, substituted “the standards and certification requirements in this subdivision” for “these standards and certification requirements” in the third sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment by c. 758 inserted subdivision 53 and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 366 deleted “and juvenile correctional officers employed at a juvenile correctional facility as the term is defined in §

66-25.3

” at the end of subdivision 9 and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 487 and 488 are identical, and added subdivision 54 and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment by c. 493 inserted “including school security officers described in clause (b) of § 22.1-280.2:1” in subdivision 42.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 123 added subdivision 55 and renumbered former subdivision 55 as subdivision 56.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 184 and 638 are identical, and in subdivision 42, in the second sentence, substituted “be specific to” for “include, but shall not be limited to,” inserted “and shall include,” added the designations for clauses (i) through (viii), inserted “including de-escalation techniques such as a physical alternative to restraint” in clause (iv), added clauses (vi) and (vii), inserted “including child and adolescent development and brain research” in clause (viii) and made stylistic changes; and in subdivision 54, added “and shall include” and clauses (i) through (viii).

The 2020 amendment by c. 526 added the final sentence in subdivision 9.

The 2020 amendment by c. 535, inserted a new subdivision 55, which was subsequently renumbered as 56 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1206 and 1262 are identical, and inserted subdivision 55, which was subsequently renumbered as 57 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 27, effective March 1, 2021, inserted subdivision 61 and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 32, effective March 1, 2021, inserted subdivision 58 and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 36, effective March 1, 2021, in subdivision 2, added the second sentence;
in subdivisions 37 c and 39, inserted “systemic and individual racism” and substituted “bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

, which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability” for “biased policing”; in subdivision 38, inserted “(i)” and “systemic and individual racism,” substituted “bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

, which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability” for “biased policing” and added clauses (ii) and (iii); in subdivisions 42 and 54, inserted “systemic and individual racism” in clause (vi) and substituted “use” for “abuse” in clause (vii); added subdivisions 59 and 63 and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, effective March 1, 2021, in subdivision 15, substituted “training academies” for “training schools”; in subdivision 37 c, inserted “racism,” inserted “racially” and added “which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability” to the end; added subdivision 37 k and made related changes; in subdivision 38, inserted “(i),” “racism,” “racially” and added “which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability” in clause (i) and added clauses (ii) and (iii);
in subdivision 39, inserted “racism,” “racially” and “which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability”; in subdivisions 42 and 54, inserted “racism” in clause (vi) and substituted “use” for “abuse” in clause (vii); added subdivisions 58 through 62 and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41 and 42, effective March 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted subdivision 64 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 48, effective March 1, 2021, in subdivision 15, substituted “training academies” for “training schools”; in subdivisions 37 c and 39, inserted “systemic and individual racism” and substituted “racially biased policing and bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

, which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability” for “biased policing”; in subdivision 38, inserted “(i)” and “systemic and individual racism,” substituted “racially biased policing and bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

, which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability” for “biased policing” and added clauses (ii) and (iii); in subdivisions 42 and 54, inserted
“racism” in clause (vi) and substituted “use disorders” for “abuse disorders” in clause (vii); added subdivisions 58 through 60 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 55, effective March 1, 2021, added subdivisions 37 k and 62 and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 467, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “to include frequency of retraining” in subdivision 59.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 45 and 46 are identical, and added current subdivision 37 j and redesignated accordingly.